Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.050

Authority for planning.

Upon the creation of a planning agency as authorized in RCW 36.70.030 and 36.70.040, a county may engage in a planning program as defined by this chapter. Two or more counties may jointly engage in a planning program as defined herein for their combined areas.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.050. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 5.]